grammar/kunwok-acceptor.xfst
# Vowels
define V [ a | e | i | o | u ];
define C [ b | m | w | k | g | d | n | l | r | j | y | h ];

# Flag Diacritics
define FLAGS [
    ("@P.TYPE.N@") |
    ("@R.TYPE.N@") |
    ("@R.TENSE.P@") | 
    ("@P.TENSE.P@") | 
    ("@R.TENSE.NP@") |
    ("@P.TENSE.NP@") |
    ("@P.VALENCE.TRNS@") |
    ("@R.VALENCE.TRNS@") |
    ("@P.VALENCE.INTR@") |
    ("@R.VALENCE.INTR@") ];

define PotentialVerbRoot  [C* V+ C*]+;

read lexc class.verb.lexc
define VerbLexicon; 

read lexc class.nouns.lexc
define NounLexicon;

read lexc class.adj.adv.lexc
define AdjAdvLexicon;

read lexc class.func.lexc
define FuncLexicon;

# Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

# Define regular vowel changes
define DeletePrecedingVowel V -> 0 || _ "^" FLAGS * "~" .o.
                            "~" -> 0;

# Define regular vowel changes
define DeleteFollowingVowel V -> 0 || FLAGS * "=" _ .o.
                            "=" -> 0 ;

# Directional phonological changes
define DirPhonChanges "(ku)" -> 0 || V "^" _ m .o.
                      "(ku)" -> k u || FLAGS * "^" _ m .o.
                      "(ku)" -> 0 || _ ;

# FlapVowelChanges
define FlapChange "(rr)" -> r r || V "^" FLAGS * _ .o.
                  "(rr)" -> d ;

# Biyameni -> Biyami
define NasalConsChange e -> 0 || _ "^" FLAGS * "+" .o.
                       n -> 0 || "^" "+" _       .o.
                       "+" -> 0;

# 'r' can change depending on its environment
define RAllophony "(r)" -> 0 || _ "^" FLAGS * "(r)" .o.
                  "(r)" -> 0 || _ "^" FLAGS * r       .o.
                  "(r)" -> 0 || l _ .o.
                  "(r)" -> r;

define NoisyPhones  "bb" (->) [ "b" | "m" ] .o.
                    "ng" (->) [ "ɲ" | "ŋ" | "n" ] .o.
                    "dd" (->) [ "t" | "n" | "d" | "ʈ" | "b" ] .o.
                    "rdd" (->) [ "ʈ"| "t" | "ɻ" | "d"] .o.
                    "rd" (->) [ "ʈ" | "t" | "ɻ" | "d"] .o.
                    "rn" (->) [ "ɳ" | "n" | "ɲ"] .o.
                    "rl" (->) [ "ɭ" | "l" | "r" ] .o.
                    "rr" (->) [ "r" | "ɹ" ] .o.
                    "djdj" (->) ["ɟ" | "k" | "ɲ"] .o.
                    "dj" (->) ["ɟ" | "k" | "ɲ"] .o.
                    "nj" (->) [ "ɲ" | "n" | "ŋ" | "ɟ" | "ɳ" ] .o.
                    "b" (->) [ "b" | "m"] .o.
                    "m" (->) [ "m" | "n" | "b" ] .o.
                    "kk" (->) [ "k" | "ɟ" ] .o.
                    "k" (->) [ "k" | "ɟ" ] .o.
                    "d" (->) [ "t" | "n" | "d" | "ʈ" | "b" ] .o.
                    "n" (->) [ "n" | "m" | "ɳ" | "ɲ" | "ŋ"] .o.
                    "l" (->) [ "l" | "r" | "ɭ" | "t"] .o.
                    "r" (->) [ "l" | "ɭ" ] .o.
                    "y" (->) [ "j" | "ɪ" | "ɛ" ] .o.
                    "h" (->) [ "ʔ" ] .o.
                    "a" (->) [ "a" | "ɪ" | "ɔ" | "ɛ" | "ɐ" ] .o.
                    "e" (->) [ "ɛ" | "ɔ" | "ɪ" | "j" ] .o.
                    "i" (->) [ "i" | "ɪ" | "ɛ" | "j" ] .o.
                    "o" (->) [ "o" | "ɔ" | "u"] .o.
                    "w" (->) [ "w" | "u" ] .o.
                    "u" (->) [ "u" | "ɔ" | "ʊ" ] ;

#define EditDistance [?* [?:0|0:?|?:?-?] ?*]<2;

define VerbGrammar  VerbLexicon .o.   
                    DeletePrecedingVowel .o.
                    DeleteFollowingVowel .o.
                    DirPhonChanges       .o.
                    FlapChange           .o.
                    NasalConsChange      .o.
                    RAllophony           .o.
                    Cleanup;

define NounGrammar NounLexicon .o.
                   FlapChange           .o.
                   NasalConsChange      .o.
                   RAllophony           .o.
                   Cleanup;

define AdjAdvGrammar AdjAdvLexicon .o.
                     FlapChange           .o.
                     NasalConsChange      .o.
                     RAllophony           .o.
                     Cleanup;

define wspace [..] (->) " " || _;

define FullGrammar FuncLexicon | AdjAdvGrammar | NounGrammar | VerbGrammar ;

regex  [[[ "-":? ]* [0:" "] [FullGrammar .o. wspace].l [0:" "] [ "-":? ]*] .o. NoisyPhones].i;
